Utah statutes.
31A-40-302.   Licensing process.

(1)  To apply for an initial or renewal license under this chapter, a person shall:

(a) (i)  submit an application with the commissioner on a form and in a manner the commissioner shall determine by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(ii)  pay a license fee determined in accordance with Section 31A-3-103 that is not refunded if the application:

(A)  is denied;

(B)  does not comply with Section 31A-40-303; or

(C)  if incomplete, is never completed by the person filing the application; or

(b)  comply with Section 31A-40-303.

(2)  In the application described in Subsection (1)(a), the person shall provide:

(a)  any name under which the professional employer organization will engage in a professional employer service;

(b)  the address of the principal place of business of the professional employer organization;

(c)  the address of each location the professional employer organization maintains in this state;

(d)  the professional employer organization's federal taxpayer or employer identification number;

(e)  the following information by jurisdiction of each name under which the professional employer organization operated in the five years preceding the day on which the person submits the application:

(i)  the name;

(ii)  an alternative name, if any;

(iii)  a name of a predecessor; and

(iv)  if known, a successor business entity;

(f)  a statement of ownership that includes the name and evidence of the business experience of a person that, individually or acting in concert with one or more other persons, owns or controls, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of the equity interests of the professional employer organization;

(g)  a statement of management that includes the name and evidence of the business experience of an individual who:

(i)  serves as president of the professional employer organization;

(ii)  serves as chief executive officer of the professional employer organization; or

(iii)  may act as a senior executive officer of the professional employer organization; and

(h)  a financial statement that:

(i)  sets forth the financial condition of:

(A)  the professional employer organization; or

(B)  a professional employer organization group in which the professional employer organization is a member;

(ii)  states whether or not the professional employer organization complies with Section 31A-40-205; and

(iii)  complies with Section 31A-40-305.

(3)  A professional employer organization shall renew its license by no later than October 1 of each year.

